Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1116
Violations; general penalty provisions.

A person who willfully violates, attempts to violate, or conspires to violate any of the provisions of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act for which no other penalty is provided is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 40.